Washington statutes.
RCW 19.85.025

Application of chapter—Limited.

(1) Unless an agency receives a written objection to the expedited repeal of a rule, this chapter does not apply to a rule proposed for expedited repeal pursuant to RCW 34.05.353. If an agency receives a written objection to expedited repeal of the rule, this chapter applies to the rule-making proceeding.

(2) This chapter does not apply to a rule proposed for expedited adoption under RCW 34.05.353, unless a written objection is timely filed with the agency and the objection is not withdrawn.

(3) This chapter does not apply to the adoption of a rule described in RCW 34.05.310(4).

(4) This chapter does not apply to the adoption of a rule if an agency is able to demonstrate that the proposed rule does not affect small businesses.

(5) An agency is not required to prepare a separate small business economic impact statement under RCW 19.85.040 if it prepared an analysis under RCW 34.05.328 that meets the requirements of a small business economic impact statement, and if the agency reduced the costs imposed by the rule on small business to the extent required by RCW 19.85.030(2). The portion of the analysis that meets the requirements of RCW 19.85.040 shall be filed with the code reviser and provided to any person requesting it in lieu of a separate small business economic impact statement.

[ 2017 c 53 s 1; 1997 c 409 s 212; 1995 c 403 s 401.]

NOTES:

Part headings—Severability—1997 c 409: See notes following RCW 43.22.051.

Application—1995 c 403 ss 201, 301-305, 401-405, and 801: See note following RCW 34.05.328.

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.